Idaho, session 2026, H0908.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Military Management Program in the
Military Division the following amounts to be expended according to the des-
ignated expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $190,800 $190,800
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund $120,000 0 120,000
TOTAL $120,000 $190,800 $310,800
SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Military Division and
the Office of the State Controller shall transfer $17,800 from the General
Fund to the Hazardous Substance Emergency Response Fund as soon as practica-
ble for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. Such moneys shall be
used to reimburse costs incurred by the Office of Emergency Management Pro-
gram in the Military Division pursuant to Section 39-7110, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 2 of this act shall be in full force and effect
on and after passage and approval, and Section 1 of this act shall be in full
force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.